Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-47] Modifying and rescinding
designated areas. The modification of the boundaries or the rescinding of
existing water management areas by the commission may be initiated by the
chairperson or by a petition to the commission by any person with proper
standing. The procedure for modifying the boundaries of an existing water
management area or for rescinding an existing water management area shall be
substantially similar to that for the designation of a water management area.
[L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next